tr: Enginar çeşidi: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Yer elması (Kudüs enginarı); Mammole; Romagna Moru; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Diğer
de: Artischockensorte: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambur (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violett; Sonstige
nb: Artisjokkvariant: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalem (jordskokk); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Annet
pt-PT: Variedade de alcachofra: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Alcachofra de Jerusalém (Tupinambo); Mammole; Violeta de Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violeta; Outros
es: Variedad de alcachofa: Corazón grande; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalén (tupinambo); Mammole; Púrpura de Romaña; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violeta; Otra
ro-RO: Soi de anghinare: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambur (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Altele
pt-BR: Variedade de alcachofra: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalém (Tupinambo); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violeta; Outro
it: Varietà di carciofo: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambur (Jerusalem); Mammole; Violetto di Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violetto; Altro
sl-SI: Sorta artičok: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambur (Jerusalem); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Drugo
zh-TW: 朝鮮薊品種: 大心 (Big Heart); 綠地球 (Green Globe); 帝國之星 (Imperial Star); 菊芋 (Jerusalem Sunchoke); Mammole; 羅馬涅紫 (Purple of Romagna); 羅馬 (Romanesco); Spinosi; 紫色 (Violet); 其他
vi: Loại atiso: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalem (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Khác
ru: Сорт артишока: Big Heart; Зеленый глобус; Имперская звезда; Топинамбур (иерусалимский артишок); Маммоле; Фиолетовый из Романьи; Романеско; Спинози; Виолет; Другое
ko: 아티초크 종류: 빅 하트; 그린 글로브; 임페리얼 스타; 예루살렘(선초크); 마몰레; 퍼플 오브 로마냐; 로마네스코; 스피노시; 바이올렛; 기타
cs: Odrůda artyčoku: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jeruzalémský artyčok (topinambur); Mammole; Purpurový z Romagny; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Ostatní
hu: Articsókafajta: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Csicsóka (Jeruzsálemi articsóka); Mammole; Romagnai lila; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Egyéb
sk-SK: Odroda artičoku: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jeruzalemský (Topinambur); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Iné
hr-HR: Sorta artičoke: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jeruzalemska (čičoka); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Ostalo
da: Artiskoksort: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jordskokke; Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Andet
th: สายพันธุ์อาร์ติโชก: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; เยรูซาเลม (ซันโช้ก); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; อื่นๆ
nl: Artisjok ras: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jeruzalem-artisjok; Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Overige
el: Ποικιλία αγκινάρας: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Αγκινάρα Ιερουσαλήμ (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Άλλο
pl: Odmiana karczocha: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambur (Jerusalem); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Inne
ja: アーティチョークの種類: ビッグハート; グリーングローブ; インペリアルスター; エルサレム (サンチョーク); マンモーレ; パープルオブロマーニャ; ロマネスコ; スピノーシ; バイオレット; その他
bg-BG: Сорт артишок: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Ерусалимски артишок (гулия); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Друго
fr: Variété d’artichaut: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jérusalem (topinambour); Mammole; Violet de Romagne; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Autre
lt-LT: Artišokų veislė: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Topinambai (Jeruzalės artišokai); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Kita
zh-CN: 洋蓟品种: 大心; 绿球; 帝王星; 菊芋（洋姜）; 猛犸; 罗马涅紫; 罗马内斯科; 斯皮诺西; 紫色; 其他
fi: Artisokkalajike: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalem (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Muu
en: Artichoke variety: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jerusalem (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Other
sv: Kronärtskocksort: Big Heart; Green Globe; Imperial Star; Jordärtskocka (Sunchoke); Mammole; Purple of Romagna; Romanesco; Spinosi; Violet; Annat